West Virginia, session 2025, HB3141.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. PROCEDURE. §54-2-22. Additional fees for eminent domain proceedings. Upon an order being entered on the value being paid to a landowner during an eminent domain proceeding, any entity, private or government, shall pay an additional fee of 15% of the court ordered value to the county or counties where the property is being taken.  This fee is in addition to other costs to the entity condemning the land and shall not reduce the amount paid to the landowner.  The additional fee shall be used by said county only for acquisition of additional public forests, parks, recreation facilities, and improvements to the same.